California, session 20252026, AB2240.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14149.96 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:14149.96. (a) The department shall measure and assess whether private duty nursing services provided as part of the early periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) benefit are in compliance with federal Medicaid requirements for the provision of private duty nursing services to children under 21 years of age. The assessment shall include, but is not limited to, both of the following:(1) A comparison of the number of hours of EPSDT private duty nursing services authorized by the Medi-Cal program to the hours actually provided to eligible beneficiary children.(2) A determination of whether the reimbursement rates for EPSDT private duty nursing services are sufficient to ensure that all authorized hours are able to be provided to eligible beneficiary children.(b) By no later than March 1, 2027, the department shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature on the findings of the assessment described in subdivision (a) in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 1743.2 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1743.2.(a) “Private duty nursing agency” means a private or public organization, including, but not limited to, any partnership, corporation, political subdivision of the state, or other government agency within the state, that provides, or arranges for the provision of, private duty nursing services, as described in Section 1743.3.(b) “Private duty nursing services” means skilled nursing services provided on a shift basis for patients who require individual and continuous nursing care, and that meets all of the following requirements:(1) Is provided by a registered nurse or a licensed vocational nurse, except that any person accepted for service whose care requires medical orders shall be under the care of a physician, dentist, podiatrist, or other licensed practitioner within their scope of practice.(2) Is provided to the patient in their temporary or permanent place of residence or other community-based setting and includes, one or both of the following locations:(A) The patient’s home.(B) Outside of the patient’s home, as necessitated by normal life activities.(c)Private duty nursing services, provided to a child under 21 years of age by a home health agency, as defined in Section 1727, shall be considered specialty care for purposes of Medi-Cal reimbursement under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of, but not Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) of, Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.